District of Columbia statutes.
38-408

Utilization of Business High School building.

Upon completion of the Roosevelt (Business) High School the building now occupied by the Business High School shall be utilized for senior high and elementary school purposes.

Feb. 23, 1931, 46 Stat. 1395, ch. 282, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-208.
1973 Ed., § 31-809.